Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202289-187.01
Weighing and measuring establishment; permit required.

A person shall not operate a weighing and measuring establishment in the State of Nebraska unless such person holds a valid permit from the department. If the permitholder has more than one location with commercial weighing and measuring devices, he or she shall have a permit for each location.

Laws 1991, LB 356, § 12;

Laws 2020, LB835, § 7.